Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 3.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2703
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Foreclosure Protection Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 76-2704 to 76-2712 apply.

Laws 2008, LB123, § 3.
July 18, 2008